Hawaii, session 2026, SB2303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that with federal solar tax credits expiring ahead of schedule, households may seek alternative options to reduce energy costs.  Portable "plug‑in" solar power devices offer a more flexible option than traditional renewable energy installations to reduce energy costs, particularly for households in condominiums or other multi-unit properties. Accordingly, the purpose of this act is to clarify the exemptions and requirements for the use of portable solar generation devices, and provide liability protections for electric utilities. SECTION 2.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part     PORTABLE SOLAR GENERATION DEVICES §196-    Definitions.  As used in this part: "Portable solar generation device" means a moveable photovoltaic generation device that: (1)  Has a maximum power output of not more than one thousand two hundred watts; (2)  Is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system through a standard one hundred twenty volt alternating current outlet; (3)  Is intended primarily to offset part of the user's electricity consumption; (4)  Meets the standards of the most recent version of the National Electrical Code; and (5)  Is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory. §196-    Portable solar generation devices; exemptions; requirements.  (a) A portable solar generation device that meets the requirements of this part shall be: (1)  Exempt from interconnection requirements as described in section 269-142; and (2)  Not subject to net energy metering as described in part VI of chapter 269. (b) A portable solar generation device shall include a device or feature that prevents the system from energizing the building's electrical system during a power outage. (c) An electric utility: (1)  Shall not require a customer using a portable solar generation device to: (A)  Obtain the electric utility's approval before installing or using the system; (B)  Pay any fee or charge related to the system; or (C)  Install any additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into the system; and (2)  Shall not be liable for any damage or injury caused by a portable solar generation device." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________